Arkansas, session 2025, HB1893.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 14, Subchapter 10, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-14-1005. Emotional support animals on private property or business
premises — Liability.
(a)(1) Unless prohibited by the Fair Housing Act, 42 U.S.C. § 3601 et
seq., as it existed on January 1, 2025, or other existing federal law, a
private property owner may ban an emotional support animal from his or her
private property.
(2) If the private property is a business, the business owner
may ban an emotional support animal from the business premises by:
*CRH206*
03/21/2025 7:18:50 AM CRH206

HB1893
(A) Verbally telling a customer or visitor that the
emotional support animal is not allowed on the business premises; or
(B) Posting a sign in a conspicuous place at the entrance
of the business premises stating that emotional support animals are
prohibited.
(b) A private property owner or business owner shall not be held
liable for an injury to a customer or visitor by an emotional support animal
except in a case of gross negligence by the private property owner or
business owner.



























03/21/2025 7:18:50 AM CRH206